Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-209
Reasonable qualifications, defined.

Reasonable qualifications shall mean the standard of the reasonable criteria established and consistently used by the supplier for similarly situated Nebraska wholesalers that entered into, continued, or renewed an agreement with the supplier during a period of twenty-four months prior to the proposed transfer of the wholesaler's business or for similarly situated Nebraska wholesalers who have changed managers or designated managers during a period of twenty-four months prior to the proposed change in the manager or successor manager of the wholesaler's business.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 9.